tools/nvda/louis/tables/gurumuki.cti
# This table contains braille codes and rules for Gurumukhi script.

#-author: Dipendra Manocha <dmanocha@daisy.org>
#-author: Jake Kyle
#-maintainer: Dipendra Manocha <dmanocha@daisy.org>
#-updated: 2022-05-23

# Copyright (C) 2014,2022 National Institute for Visually Handicapped, 116, Rajpur Road, Dehradun, Uttrakhand, India
# Copyright (C) 2021-2022 by Compass Braille http://www.compassbraille.org

# This file is part of liblouis.
#
# liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
# under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
# published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
# License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
# WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with liblouis. If not, see
# <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# This table is built and maintained under an activity of Braille Council of India
# Contributors: Dipendra Manocha, Sreeja, Dinesh Kaushal, Mesar Hameed, Jake Kyle (Compass Braille, UK)
# Updated on May 23, 2022
# To report any bugs or any suggestion, please write to dmanocha@daisy.org and sreeja.param@gmail.com

include braille-patterns.cti

replace \x200D

# Punctuation
noback punctuation \x0A64 256 RESERVED- 0964 #DEVANAGARI DANDA
noback punctuation \x0A65 256-256 RESERVED- 0965 # DEVANAGARI DOUBLE DANDA
punctuation \x0964 256 # DEVANAGARI DANDA
noback punctuation \x0965 256-256 # DEVANAGARI DOUBLE DANDA
postpunc \x0964 256
postpunc \x0964\x0964 256-256

# Signs
letter \x0A01 56 # GURUMUKHI SIGN ADAK BINDI
letter \x0A02 3 # GURUMUKHI SIGN BINDI
letter \x0A03 6 # GURUMUKHI SIGN VISARGA

# Vowel letters
letter \x0A05 1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER A = aira
letter \x0A06 345 # GURUMUKHI LETTER AA
letter \x0A07 24 # GURUMUKHI LETTER I
letter \x0A08 35 # GURUMUKHI LETTER II
letter \x0A09 136 # GURUMUKHI LETTER U
letter \x0A0A 1256 # GURUMUKHI LETTER UU
letter \x0A0F 15 # GURUMUKHI LETTER EE
letter \x0A10 34 # GURUMUKHI LETTER Al
letter \x0A13 135 # GURUMUKHI LETTER OO
letter \x0A14 246 # GURUMUKHI LETTER AU

# Consonants
letter \x0A15 13 # GURUMUKHI LETTER KA
letter \x0A16 46 # GURUMUKHI LETTER KHA
letter \x0A17 1245 # GURUMUKHI LETTER GA
letter \x0A18 126 # GURUMUKHI LETTER GHA
letter \x0A19 346 # GURUMUKHI LETTER NGA
letter \x0A1A 14 # GURUMUKHI LETTER CA
letter \x0A1B 16 # GURUMUKHI LETTER CHA
letter \x0A1C 245 # GURUMUKHI LETTER JA
letter \x0A1D 356 # GURUMUKHI LETTER JHA
letter \x0A1E 25 # GURUMUKHI LETTER NYA
letter \x0A1F 23456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER TTA
letter \x0A20 2456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER TTHA
letter \x0A21 1246 # GURUMUKHI LETTER DDA
letter \x0A22 123456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER DDHA
letter \x0A23 3456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER NNA
letter \x0A24 2345 # GURUMUKHI LETTER TA
letter \x0A25 1456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER THA
letter \x0A26 145 # GURUMUKHI LETTER DA
letter \x0A27 2346 # GURUMUKHI LETTER DHA
letter \x0A28 1345 # GURUMUKHI LETTER NA
letter \x0A2A 1234 # GURUMUKHI LETTER PA
letter \x0A2B 235 # GURUMUKHI LETTER PHA
letter \x0A2C 12 # GURUMUKHI LETTER BA
letter \x0A2D 45 # GURUMUKHI LETTER BHA
letter \x0A2E 134 # GURUMUKHI LETTER MA
letter \x0A2F 13456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER YA
letter \x0A30 1235 # GURUMUKHI LETTER RA
letter \x0A32 123 # GURUMUKHI LETTER LA
letter \x0A33 456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER LLA = 0A32 AND 0A3C
letter \x0A35 1236 # GURUMUKHI LETTER VA
letter \x0A36 146 # GURUMUKHI LETTER SHA - 0A38 AND 0A3C
letter \x0A38 234 # GURUMUKHI LETTER SA
letter \x0A39 125 # GURUMUKHI LETTER HA

attribute letter \x0A3C letter \x0A3C # GURMUKHI SIGN NUKTA: pairin bindi

# Vowel Signs
letter \x0A3E 345 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN AA= kanna
letter \x0A3F 24 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN I= sihari stands to the left of the consonant
letter \x0A40 35 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN II = BIHARI
letter \x0A41 136 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN U = AUNKAR
letter \x0A42 1256 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN UU = DULAINKAR
letter \x0A47 15 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN EE
letter \x0A48 34 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN AI = DULAINKAR
letter \x0A4B 135 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN OO =HORA
letter \x0A4C 246 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN AU = KANAURA

letter \x0A4D 4 # GURMUKHI SIGN VIRAMA

# Additional letters
letter \x0A59 1346 # GURUMUKHI LETTER KHHA = 0A16 AND 0A3C
letter \x0A5A 5-1245 # GURMUKHI LETTER GHHA
letter \x0A5B 1356 # GURUMUKHI LETTER ZA = 0A1C AND 0A3C
letter \x0A5C 12456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER RRA
letter \x0A5E 124 # GURUMUKHI LETTER FA

# Digits
digit \x0A66 245 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT ZERO
digit \x0A67 1 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT ONE
digit \x0A68 12 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT TWO
digit \x0A69 14 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT THREE
digit \x0A6A 145 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT FOUR
digit \x0A6B 15 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT FIVE
digit \x0A6C 124 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT SIX
digit \x0A6D 1245 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT SEVEN
digit \x0A6E 125 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT EIGHT
digit \x0A6F 24 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT NINE

litdigit \x0A66 245 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT ZERO
litdigit \x0A67 1 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT ONE
litdigit \x0A68 12 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT TWO
litdigit \x0A69 14 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT THREE
litdigit \x0A6A 145 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT FOUR
litdigit \x0A6B 15 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT FIVE
litdigit \x0A6C 124 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT SIX
litdigit \x0A6D 1245 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT SEVEN
litdigit \x0A6E 125 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT EIGHT
litdigit \x0A6F 24 # GURUMUKHI DIGIT NINE

# Additional characters
letter \x0A70 56 # GURUMUKHI TIPPI - nasalization
letter \x0A71 4 # GURUMUKHI ADDAK - doubles following consonant
letter \x0A74 3456-1-136 # GURUMUKHI EK ONKAR - God is One

always \x0A70 56 # TIPPI - to override ADAK BINDI in backtranslation
always \x0A71 4 # ADDAK - to override virama in backtranslation

# Compound letters
noback always \x0A16\x0A3C 1346 # KHA + NUKTA = KHHA (same as \x0A59)
noback always \x0A17\x0A3C 5-1245 # GA + NUKTA = GHHA
noback always \x0A1C\x0A3C 1356 # JA + NUKTA = ZA (same as \x0A5B)
always \x0A24\x0A3C 5-2345 # TA + NUKTA
noback always \x0A2B\x0A3C 124 # PHA + NUKTA = FA (same as \x0A5E)
noback always \x0A2B\x0A3F\x0A3C 124-24 # PHA + SIGN I + NUKTA
noback always \x0A32\x0A3C 456 # LA + NUKTA = LLA (same as \x0A33)
noback always \x0A38\x0A3C 146 # SA + NUKTA = SHA (same as \x0A36)

# Numbers in backtranslation
midendword \x0A23 3456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER NNA

# Vowels in backtranslation
# generally vowels use letters if on their own or at start of word
sufword \x0A05 1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER A = aira
sufword \x0A06 345 # GURUMUKHI LETTER AA
sufword \x0A07 24 # GURUMUKHI LETTER I
sufword \x0A08 35 # GURUMUKHI LETTER II
sufword \x0A09 136 # GURUMUKHI LETTER U
sufword \x0A0A 1256 # GURUMUKHI LETTER UU
sufword \x0A0F 15 # GURUMUKHI LETTER EE
sufword \x0A10 34 # GURUMUKHI LETTER Al
sufword \x0A13 135 # GURUMUKHI LETTER OO
sufword \x0A14 246 # GURUMUKHI LETTER AU

# generally vowels use signs in middle of word
always \x0A3E 345 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN AA= kanna
always \x0A3F 24 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN I= sihari stands to the left of the consonant
always \x0A40 35 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN II = BIHARI
always \x0A41 136 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN U = AUNKAR
always \x0A42 1256 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN UU = DULAINKAR
always \x0A47 15 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN EE
always \x0A48 34 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN AI = DULAINKAR
always \x0A4B 135 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN OO =HORA
always \x0A4C 246 # GURUMUKHI VOWEL SIGN AU = KANAURA

# exceptions to general rules above when sequences of vowels together
sufword \x0A06\x0A08 345-35 # LETTER AA + LETTER II
sufword \x0A06\x0A07\x0A06 345-24-345 # LETTER AA + LETTER I + LETTER AA
sufword \x0A06\x0A08\x0A06 345-35-345 # LETTER AA + LETTER II + LETTER AA
sufword \x0A06\x0A0F 345-15 # LETTER AA + LETTER EE
sufword \x0A06\x0A13 345-135 # LETTER AA + LETTER OO
sufword \x0A06\x0A09 345-136 # LETTER AA + LETTER U
sufword \x0A07\x0A09 24-136 # LETTER I + LETTER U
sufword \x0A10\x0A09 34-136 # LETTER AI +LETTER U
midendword \x0A3E\x0A02\x0A09 345-3-136 # SIGN AA + BINDI + LETTER U
midendword \x0A3E\x0A0F 345-15 # SIGN AA + LETTER EE
midendword \x0A3E\x0A07 345-24 # SIGN AA + LETTER I
midendword \x0A3E\x0A08 345-35 # SIGN AA + LETTER II
midendword \x0A3E\x0A07\x0A06 345-24-345 # SIGN AA + LETTER I + LETTER AA
midendword \x0A3E\x0A08\x0A06 345-35-345 # SIGN AA + LETTER II + LETTER AA
midendword \x0A3E\x0A08\x0A0F 345-35-15 # SIGN AA + LETTER II + LETTER EE
midendword \x0A3E\x0A09 345-136 # SIGN AA + LETTER U
midendword \x0A3E\x0A0A 345-1256 # SIGN AA + LETTER UU
midendword \x0A3E\x0A13 345-135 # SIGN AA + LETTER OO
midendword \x0A3F\x0A06 24-345 # SIGN I + LETTER AA
midendword \x0A3F\x0A06\x0A07\x0A06 24-345-24-345 # SIGN I + LETTER AA + LETTER I + LETTER AA
midendword \x0A3F\x0A06\x0A08 24-345-35 # SIGN I + LETTER AA + LETTER II
midendword \x0A3F\x0A06\x0A09 24-345-136 # SIGN I + LETTER AA + LETTER U
midendword \x0A3F\x0A06\x0A0F 24-345-15 # SIGN I + LETTER AA + LETTER EE
midendword \x0A3F\x0A06\x0A13 24-345-135 # SIGN I + LETTER AA + LETTER OO
midendword \x0A3F\x0A13 24-135 # SIGN I + LETTER OO
midendword \x0A3F\x0A09 24-136 # SIGN I + LETTER U
midendword \x0A40\x0A06 35-345 # SIGN II + LETTER AA
midendword \x0A40\x0A09 35-136 # SIGN II + LETTER U
midendword \x0A40\x0A0F 35-15 # SIGN II + LETTER EE
midendword \x0A40\x0A13 35-135 # SIGN II + LETTER OO
midendword \x0A41\x0A06 136-345 # SIGN U + LETTER AA
midendword \x0A41\x0A06\x0A0F 136-345-15 # SIGN U + LETTER AA + LETTER EE
midendword \x0A41\x0A06\x0A08\x0A0F 136-345-35-15 # SIGN U + LETTER AA + LETTER II + LETTER EE
midendword \x0A41\x0A06\x0A09 136-345-136 # SIGN U + LETTER AA + LETTER U
midendword \x0A42\x0A06 1256-345 # SIGN UU + LETTER AA
midendword \x0A42\x0A08 1256-35 # SIGN UU + LETTER II
midendword \x0A42\x0A0F 1256-15 # SIGN UU + LETTER EE
midendword \x0A47\x0A06 15-345 # SIGN EE + LETTER AA
midendword \x0A47\x0A08 15-35 # SIGN EE + LETTER II
midendword \x0A47\x0A08\x0A0F 15-35-15 # SIGN EE + LETTER II + LETTER EE
midendword \x0A47\x0A0A 15-1256 # SIGN EE + LETTER UU
midendword \x0A47\x0A13 15-135 # SIGN EE + LETTER OO
midendword \x0A48\x0A06 34-345 # SIGN AI + LETTER AA
midendword \x0A4B\x0A0F 135-15 # SIGN OO + LETTER EE
midendword \x0A4B\x0A07\x0A06 135-24-345 # SIGN OO + LETTER I + LETTER AA
midendword \x0A4B\x0A08 135-35 # SIGN OO + LETTER II
midendword \x0A4B\x0A08\x0A06 135-35-345 # SIGN OO + LETTER II + LETTER AA
midendword \x0A4B\x0A0A 135-1256 # SIGN OO + LETTER UU
midendword \x0A4C\x0A09 246-136 # SIGN AU + LETTER U

# when vowel letters used after consonants we need dot 1 between
always \x0A15\x0A08 13-1-35 # LETTER KA + LETTER II
always \x0A15\x0A08\x0A06 13-1-35-345 # LETTER KA + LETTER II + LETTER AA
always \x0A17\x0A08 1245-1-35 # LETTER GA + LETTER II
always \x0A17\x0A08\x0A06 1245-1-35-345 # LETTER GA + LETTER II + LETTER AA
sufword \x0A17\x0A0F 1245-1-15 # LETTER GA + LETTER EE
always \x0A2A\x0A08 1234-1-35 # LETTER PA + LETTER II
always \x0A2A\x0A09 1234-1-136 # LETTER PA + LETTER U
always \x0A2A\x0A0F 1234-1-15 # LETTER PA + LETTER EE
always \x0A2A\x0A13 1234-1-135 # LETTER PA + LETTER OO
always \x0A2D\x0A08 45-1-35 # LETTER BHA + LETTER II
always \x0A2E\x0A08 134-1-35 # LETTER MA + LETTER II
always \x0A2E\x0A0A 134-1-1256 # LETTER MA + LETTER UU
always \x0A30\x0A08 1235-1-35 # LETTER RA + LETTER II
always \x0A32\x0A08\x0A06 123-1-35-345 # LETTER LA + LETTER II + LETTER AA
always \x0A32\x0A13 123-1-135 # LETTER LA + LETTER OO
word \x0A32\x0A08 123-1-35 # LETTER LA + LETTER II

# for dot 3 backtranslation to bindi
always \x0A02 3 # GURUMUKHI SIGN BINDI
